Florida, session 2026, SB976.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 11 125.0104, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 12 125.0104âTourist development tax; procedure for levying; 13 authorized uses; referendum; enforcement.â 14 (5)âAUTHORIZED USES OF REVENUE.â 15 (a)âAll tax revenues received pursuant to this section by a 16 county imposing the tourist development tax shall be used by 17 that county for the following purposes only: 18 1.âTo acquire, construct, extend, enlarge, remodel, repair, 19 improve, maintain, operate, or promote one or more: 20 a.âPublicly owned and operated convention centers, sports 21 stadiums, sports arenas, coliseums, or auditoriums within the 22 boundaries of the county or subcounty special taxing district in 23 which the tax is levied; 24 b.âAuditoriums that are publicly owned but are operated by 25 organizations that are exempt from federal taxation pursuant to 26 26 U.S.C. s. 501(c)(3) and open to the public, within the 27 boundaries of the county or subcounty special taxing district in 28 which the tax is levied; or 29 c.âAquariums or museums that are publicly owned and 30 operated or owned and operated by not-for-profit organizations 31 and open to the public, within the boundaries of the county or 32 subcounty special taxing district in which the tax is levied; 33 2.âTo promote zoological parks that are publicly owned and 34 operated or owned and operated by not-for-profit organizations 35 and open to the public; 36 3.âTo promote and advertise tourism in this state and 37 nationally and internationally; however, if tax revenues are 38 expended for an activity, service, venue, or event, the 39 activity, service, venue, or event must have as one of its main 40 purposes the attraction of tourists as evidenced by the 41 promotion of the activity, service, venue, or event to tourists; 42 4.âTo fund convention bureaus, tourist bureaus, tourist 43 information centers, and news bureaus as county agencies or by 44 contract with the chambers of commerce or similar associations 45 in the county, which may include any indirect administrative 46 costs for services performed by the county on behalf of the 47 promotion agency; 48 5.âTo finance beach park facilities, or beach, channel, 49 estuary, or lagoon improvement, maintenance, renourishment, 50 restoration, and erosion control, including construction of 51 beach groins and shoreline protection, enhancement, cleanup, or 52 restoration of inland lakes and rivers to which there is public 53 access as those uses relate to the physical preservation of the 54 beach, shoreline, channel, estuary, lagoon, or inland lake or 55 river. However, any funds identified by a county as the local 56 matching source for beach renourishment, restoration, or erosion 57 control projects included in the long-range budget plan of the 58 stateâs Beach Management Plan, pursuant to s. 161.091, or funds 59 contractually obligated by a county in the financial plan for a 60 federally authorized shore protection project may not be used or 61 loaned for any other purpose. In counties of fewer than 100,000 62 population, up to 10 percent of the revenues from the tourist 63 development tax may be used for beach park facilities; 64 6.âTo acquire, construct, extend, enlarge, remodel, repair, 65 improve, maintain, operate, or finance public facilities within 66 the boundaries of the county or subcounty special taxing 67 district in which the tax is levied, if the public facilities 68 are needed to increase tourist-related business activities in 69 the county or subcounty special district and are recommended by 70 the county tourist development council created pursuant to 71 paragraph (4)(e). Tax revenues may be used for any related land 72 acquisition, land improvement, design and engineering costs, and 73 all other professional and related costs required to bring the 74 public facilities into service. As used in this subparagraph, 75 the term âpublic facilitiesâ means major capital improvements 76 that have a life expectancy of 5 or more years, including, but 77 not limited to, transportation, sanitary sewer, solid waste, 78 drainage, potable water, and pedestrian facilities. Tax revenues 79 may be used for these purposes only if the following conditions 80 are satisfied: 81 a.âIn the county fiscal year immediately preceding the 82 fiscal year in which the tax revenues were initially used for 83 such purposes, at least $10 million in tourist development tax 84 revenue was received or the county is a fiscally constrained 85 county, as described in s. 218.67(1), located adjacent to the 86 Gulf of America or the Atlantic Ocean; 87 b.âThe county governing board approves the use for the 88 proposed public facilities by a vote of at least two-thirds of 89 its membership; 90 c.âNo more than 70 percent of the cost of the proposed 91 public facilities will be paid for with tourist development tax 92 revenues, and sources of funding for the remaining cost are 93 identified and confirmed by the county governing board; 94 d.âAt least 40 percent of all tourist development tax 95 revenues collected in the county are spent to promote and 96 advertise tourism as provided by this subsection; and 97 e.âAn independent professional analysis, performed at the 98 expense of the county tourist development council, demonstrates 99 the positive impact of the infrastructure project on tourist 100 related businesses in the county; or 101 7.âTo employ, train, equip, insure, or otherwise fund the 102 provision of lifeguards certified by the American Red Cross, the 103 Y.M.C.A., or an equivalent nationally recognized aquatic 104 training program, for beaches on the Gulf of America or the 105 Atlantic Ocean; or 106 8.âTo fund operations of a commuter rail service as defined 107 in s. 341.301 within a regional transportation authority 108 established under chapter 343. 109 110 Subparagraphs 1. and 2. may be implemented through service 111 contracts and leases with lessees that have sufficient expertise 112 or financial capability to operate such facilities. 113 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.